Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1721
Existing contracts; validity; unaffected.

Nothing in sections 81-1701 to 81-1721 shall affect the validity of any contracts in existence on July 22, 1978.

Laws 1978, LB 715, § 21.